North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 11. Outdoor Advertising Control Act.
§ 136-133.4.
Selective vegetation removal permits.

Selected vegetation within the approved limits shall be cut, thinned, pruned, or removed by the permittee or the permittee’s agent in accordance with accepted International Society of Arboriculture (ISA) standards.

Permits are valid for a period of one year. The permittee may cut, thin, prune, or remove vegetation more than one time per year. A 48-hour notification shall be provided to the Department by the permittee before entering the right-of-way.

The permittee, or the permittee’s agent, shall not impede the flow of traffic on any highway while performing vegetation removal authorized by a permit. Access to the work site on controlled access highways must be gained without using the main travel way of the highway. The Department shall determine the traffic control signage that may be required. The permittee shall furnish, erect, and maintain the required signs as directed by the Department. The permittee, or the permittee’s agent, shall wear safety vests that conform to OSHA standards while performing the work.

Any damage to vegetation designated to remain at the site, to highway fences, signs, paved areas, or other facilities shall be repaired or replaced by the permittee to the condition prior to the occurrence of the damage caused by the permittee or the permittee’s agent. All trimmings, laps, and debris shall be removed from the right-of-way and disposed of in areas provided by the permittee. No burning or burying of trimmings, laps, or debris shall be permitted on the highway right-of-way. When chipping is used to dispose of trimmings, chips may be neatly spread on a right-of-way at locations which the Department determines will not be harmful to the environment or affect traffic safety.

Willful failure to substantially comply with all the requirements specified in the selective vegetation removal permit, unless otherwise mutually resolved by the Department and the permittee, shall result in a five-year moratorium for vegetation removal at the site, a summary revocation of the outdoor advertising permit if such willful failure meets the standards in G.S. 136-133.1(i), payment of Department investigative costs, and forfeiture of any applicable performance bond as determined by the Secretary. The moratorium shall begin upon execution of a settlement agreement or entry of a final disposition in the case.

History.

2011-397, s. 7.

§ 136-133.5.
Denial of a permit for proposed outdoor advertising.

When a district engineer determines that a proposed outdoor advertising structure would not conform to the standards of outdoor advertising as set out in the Outdoor Advertising Control Act, the district engineer shall refuse to issue a permit for that proposed outdoor advertising structure.

When a violation of the Outdoor Advertising Control Act has been discovered, the district engineer shall notify the permit applicant by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the party to be noticed, and delivering to the addressee, in writing, the reason for the denial and the statutes or rules forming the basis for the denial and include a copy of the Act.

The Department shall not issue permits for new outdoor advertising signs at a sign location for a period of five years where the unlawful destruction or illegal cutting of vegetation has occurred within 500 feet on either side of the proposed sign location and as measured along the edge of the pavement of the main travel way of the nearest controlled route. For the purposes of this section, unlawful destruction or illegal cutting is defined as the destruction or cutting of trees, shrubs, or other vegetation on the State-owned or State-maintained rights-of-way by anyone other than the Department or its authorized agents, or without written permission of the Department. Before a permit is denied pursuant to this subsection, the Department shall reveal some evidence that the unlawful destruction or illegal cutting would create, increase, or improve a view to a proposed outdoor advertising sign from the main travel way of the nearest controlled route. The five-year period shall begin on the date the Department executes a settlement agreement or final disposition of the case is entered. The five-year prohibition period for a new sign permit shall apply to all sign locations, including the following:

Sign locations where the unlawful destruction or illegal cutting of vegetation occurs prior to the time the location becomes a conforming location.

Sign locations where a revocation of an existing permit has been upheld and a sign has been removed.

Sign locations where the unlawful destruction or illegal cutting occurs prior to receipt of an outdoor advertising permit.

Sign locations where the unlawful destruction or illegal cutting occurs following receipt of an outdoor advertising permit application, but prior to the issuance of the permit by the Department.

The Department shall not issue permits for new outdoor advertising signs at a sign location where existing trees, if they were to reach the average mature size for that species, would make the proposed sign faces, when erected, not completely visible from the viewing zone. “Existing trees” are those trees that at the time of the permit application are four inches or greater in diameter as measured six inches from the ground. “Viewing zone” means the area which is 500 feet as measured along the edge of the main travel way of the controlled route on each side of the proposed sign structure which will have a sign face.

An outdoor advertising permit requested pursuant to

G.S. 136-129(a)(4)

[G.S. 136-129(4)] shall not be issued to a location if the zoning to commercial or industrial zones was adopted within one year prior to the filing of the permit application and is not part of comprehensive zoning or constitutes spot zoning, which, for purposes of this subsection, shall be defined as zoning designed primarily for the purpose of permitting outdoor advertising signs and in an area which would not normally permit outdoor advertising. Zoning shall not be considered “primarily for the purpose of permitting outdoor advertising signs” if the zoning would permit more than one principal commercial or industrial use, other than outdoor advertising, and the size of the land being zoned can practically support any one of the commercial or industrial uses.

Outdoor advertising permits shall not be issued to a location for a period of 12 months prior to the proposed letting of a new construction contract that may affect the spacing or location requirements for an outdoor advertising structure until the project is completed. The prohibition authorized by this subsection shall not extend for a period longer than 18 months. Priority in spacing shall be given by the Department to the first submitted application for an outdoor advertising permit at the location.

Outdoor advertising permits shall not be issued for a location on a North Carolina or United States route designated as a scenic byway.

History.

2011-397, s. 8.

§ 136-134.
Illegal advertising.

Any outdoor advertising erected or maintained adjacent to the right-of-way of the interstate or primary highway system after the effective date of this Article as determined by

G.S. 136-140

, in violation of the provisions of this Article or rules adopted by the Department of Transportation, or any outdoor advertising maintained without a permit regardless of the date of erection shall be illegal and shall constitute a nuisance. The Department of Transportation or its agents shall give 30 days’ notice to the owner of the illegal outdoor advertising with the exception of the owner of unlawful portable outdoor advertising for which the Department of Transportation shall give five days’ notice, if such owner is known or can by reasonable diligence be ascertained, to remove the outdoor advertising or to make it conform to the provisions of this Article or rules adopted by the Department of Transportation hereunder. The Department of Transportation or its agents shall have the right to remove the illegal outdoor advertising at the expense of the owner if the owner fails to remove the outdoor advertising or to make it conform to the provisions of this Article or rules issued by the Department of Transportation within 30 days after receipt of such notice or five days for owners of portable outdoor advertising. The Department of Transportation or its agents may enter upon private property for the purpose of removing the outdoor advertising prohibited by this Article or rules adopted by the Department of Transportation hereunder without civil or criminal liability. The costs of removing the outdoor advertising, whether by the Department of Transportation or its agents, shall be assessed against the owner of the illegal outdoor advertising by the Department of Transportation. Any person aggrieved by the decision declaring the outdoor advertising structure illegal shall be granted the right to appeal the decision in accordance with the terms of the rules and regulations enacted by the Department of Transportation pursuant to this Article to the Secretary of Transportation who shall make the final decision on the agency appeal.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 9; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, s. 12; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 32; 1999-404, s. 2.

§ 136-134.1.
Judicial review.

Any person who is aggrieved by a final decision of the Secretary of Transportation after exhausting all administrative remedies made available to him by rules and regulations enacted pursuant to this Article is entitled to judicial review of such decision under this Article. In order to obtain judicial review of the Secretary of Transportation’s decision under this Article, the person seeking review must file a petition in the Superior Court of Wake County within 30 days after written copy of the decision of the Secretary of Transportation is served upon the person seeking review. Failure to file such a petition within the time stated shall operate as a waiver of the right of such person to review under this Chapter.

The petition shall state explicitly what exceptions are taken to the decision of the Secretary of Transportation and what relief petitioner seeks. Within 10 days after the petition is filed with the court, the person seeking the review shall serve copies of the petition by registered mail, return receipt requested, upon the Department of Transportation. Within 30 days after receipt of the copy of the petition for review, or within such additional time as the court may allow, the Department of Transportation shall transmit to the reviewing court a certified copy of the written decision.

At any time before or during the review proceeding, the aggrieved party may apply to the reviewing court for an order staying the operation of the decision of the Secretary of Transportation pending the outcome of the review. The court may grant or deny the stay in its discretion upon such terms as it deems proper. The review of the decision of the Secretary of Transportation under this Article shall be conducted by the court without a jury and shall hear the matter de novo pursuant to the rules of evidence as applied in the General Court of Justice. The court, after hearing the matter may affirm, reverse or modify the decision if the decision is:

In violation of constitutional provisions; or

Not made in accordance with this Article or rules or regulations promulgated by the Department of Transportation; or

Affected by other error of law.

The party aggrieved shall have the burden of showing that the decision was violative of one of the above.

A party to the review proceedings, including the agency, may appeal to the appellate division from the final judgment of the Superior Court under the rules of procedure applicable in civil cases. The appealing party may apply to the Superior Court for a stay for its final determination or a stay of the administrative decision, whichever shall be appropriate, pending the outcome of the appeal to the appellate division.

History.

1975, c. 568, s. 13; 1977, c. 464, ss. 32, 33.

§ 136-134.2.
Notification requirements.

When the Department of Transportation notifies a permit applicant, permit holder, or the owner of an outdoor advertising structure that the application is denied, the permit revoked, or the structure is in violation of this Article or rules issued pursuant to this Article, it shall do so in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, and shall include a copy of this Article and all rules issued pursuant to this Article.

If the Department of Transportation fails to include a copy of this Article and the rules, the time period during which the permit applicant, permit holder, or owner of the outdoor advertising structure has to request a review hearing shall be tolled until the Department of Transportation provides the required materials.

History.

1999-404, s. 3.

§ 136-135.
Enforcement provisions.

Any person, firm, corporation or association, placing, erecting or maintaining outdoor advertising along the interstate system or primary system in violation of this Article or rules adopted by the Department of Transportation shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. In addition thereto, the Department of Transportation may seek injunctive relief in the Superior Court of Wake County or of the county where the outdoor advertising is located and require the outdoor advertising to conform to the provisions of this Article or rules adopted pursuant hereto, or require the removal of the said illegal outdoor advertising.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 10; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, s. 14; 1977, c. 464, s. 32; 1993, c. 539, s. 998; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-404, s. 4.

§ 136-136.
Zoning changes.

All zoning authorities shall give written notice to the Department of Transportation of the establishment or revision of any commercial and industrial zones within 660 feet of the right-of-way of interstate or primary highway systems. Notice shall be by registered mail sent to the offices of the Department of Transportation in Raleigh, North Carolina, within 15 days after the effective date of the zoning change or establishment.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 11; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1999-404, s. 10.

§ 136-137.
Information directories.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to maintain maps and to permit informational directories and advertising pamphlets to be made available at safety rest areas and to establish information centers at safety rest areas and install signs on the right-of-way for the purpose of informing the public of facilities for food, lodging and vehicle services and of places of interest and for providing such other information as may be considered desirable.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 12; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-138.
Agreements with United States authorized.

The Department of Transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with other governmental authorities relating to the control of outdoor advertising in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary highway systems, including the establishment of information centers and safety rest areas, and to take action in the name of the State to comply with the terms of the agreements.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 13; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-139.
Alternate control.

In addition to any other control provided for in this Article, the Department of Transportation may regulate outdoor advertising in accordance with the standards provided by this Article and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, by the acquisition by purchase, gift, or condemnation of easements or any other interests in real property prohibiting or controlling the erection and maintenance of advertising within 660 feet of the right-of-way line of the interstate and primary system of the State.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 14; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-140.
Availability of federal aid funds.

The Department of Transportation shall not be required to expend any funds for the regulation of outdoor advertising under this Article, nor shall the provisions of this Article, with the exception of

G.S. 136-138

hereof, have any force and effect until federal funds are made available to the State for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this Article, and the Department of Transportation has entered into an agreement with the United States Secretary of Transportation as authorized by

G.S. 136-138

hereof and as provided by the Highway Beautification Act of 1965 or subsequent amendment thereto.

History.

1967, c. 1248, s. 15; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 568, s. 15; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-140.1.
Adopt-A-Highway.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, the Department of Transportation may permit individuals or groups participating in its Adopt-A-Highway Program access to controlled access facilities for the purpose of removing litter from the right-of-way. Acknowledgment of participation in the program may be indicated by appropriate signs that shall be owned, controlled, and erected by the Department of Transportation. The size, style, specifications, and content of the signs shall be determined in the sole discretion of the Department of Transportation. The Department of Transportation may issue rules and policies necessary to administer the program.

Adopt-A-Highway participants may use contract services to clean the roadside of the sections of highway the participants have adopted only in accordance with the rules and policies issued by the Department of Transportation.

History.

1995, c. 324, s. 18.1.

§§ 136-140.2 through 136-140.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.